Kentucky statutes. TITLE III Executive Branch
CHAPTER 18 State Personnel [Repealed]

18.010.
Department of Personnel created; executive head; functions of department. [Repealed.]

18.020.
Appointment of Commissioner; qualifications; duties of commissioners and department. [Repealed.]

18.030.
Department to determine qualifications of applicants for positions in state service; tests; tests to be competitive; positions exempted from tests; classification plan; employment list. [Repealed.]

18.040.
Agency appointing officer to notify department of change of status of employe; Department of Finance may demand supporting information prior to payment of compensation. [Repealed.]

18.050.
Appointing officer of State agency may remove employe; notice to Department of Personnel; statement setting forth reasons for removal; action final, when. [Repealed.]

18.060.
Transfer of officers, employes and funds from Department of Finance to Department of Personnel. [Repealed.]

18.070.
KRS 18.010 to 18.070 not to affect existing merit systems; department may perform services for other agencies. [Repealed.]

18.080.
Political activity prohibited. [Repealed.]